Tennessee, session 114, SB2050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as "Katherine's Law."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits aggravated domestic assault who, intentionally or
knowingly, commits an assault as defined in § 39-13-101, against a domestic abuse
victim, as defined in § 36-3-601, and the assault:
(1)
(A) Involves the use or display of a deadly weapon; or
(B) Involves strangulation; and
(2)
(A) Results in serious bodily injury to another; or
(B) Results in the death of another.
(b) Aggravated domestic assault is a Class B felony.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses occurring on or after that date.
SB2050
011905
- 1 -